Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Owner/Prime Contractor Payment

66-34-201. Prime contractor entitled to payment from owner.

Performance by a prime contractor in accordance with a written contract with an owner for improvement of real property entitles the prime contractor to payment from the owner.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “prime” and substituted “entitles the prime” for “shall entitle such”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

66-34-202. Application for payment for work — Payment according to schedule for payments — Review of application by owner's agent.

If a prime contractor has performed in accordance with the prime contractor's written contract with the owner, then the owner shall pay to the prime contractor the full amount earned by the prime contractor, less only those amounts withheld in accordance with § 66-34-203. The payment must be made in accordance with the schedule for payments established within the contract and within thirty (30) days after application for payment is timely submitted by the prime contractor to the owner, in accordance with the schedule.

Failure of an architect, engineer, or other agent employed by the owner to review and approve an application for payment for work which has been performed in accordance with the contract does not excuse the owner from making payment in accordance with this chapter. This section does not require payment for work not performed if an architect, engineer, or other agent has certified that a contractor has not completed performance for a portion of work covered by the application for payment.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2006, ch. 944, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 944, § 2 provided that the act, which rewrote (a), shall apply to all contracts executed after June 20, 2006.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “prime” five times in (a); and in the last sentence of (b), inserted “for work not performed”, “, engineer, or other agent” and “for a portion of work covered by the application for payment”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

66-34-203. Withholding of payment or retainage by owner.

This chapter does not prevent the owner from reasonably withholding payment or a portion of a payment to the prime contractor, as long as the withholding is in accordance with the written contract between the owner and the prime contractor. The owner may also withhold a reasonable amount of retainage as specified in the written contract between the owner and the prime contractor, as long as the retainage amount does not exceed five percent (5%) of the amount of the contract.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2007, ch. 201, § 4; 2020, ch. 749, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 201, § 7 provided that the act, which added the proviso at the end of the last sentence, shall apply to all construction contracts to which the act applies entered into on or after July 1, 2007.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “prime” three times, substituted “This chapter does not” for “Nothing in this chapter shall”, “, as long as the withholding” for “; provided, that such withholding” and “, as long as the retainage” for “; provided, however, that the retainage”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

66-34-204. Payment of retainage by owner.

When an owner:

Has received a use and/or occupancy permit for an improvement from a governmental agency lawfully issuing such permit;

Has received a certificate of substantial completion from an architect or engineer charged with supervision of the construction of an improvement; or

Begins to use or could have begun to use an improvement;

the owner shall, after any such event and pursuant to the terms of the written contract, pay to the prime contractor all retainage the owner may have withheld pursuant to the written contract, except any sum which the owner may reasonably withhold in accordance with the written contract between the owner and the prime contractor; the retainage must be paid within ninety (90) days after the date of the occurrence of an event included in subdivision (1), (2) or (3).

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2007, ch. 201, § 5; 2020, ch. 749, § 21.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 201, § 7 provided that the act, which added the proviso at the end of the section, shall apply to all construction contracts to which the act applies entered into on or after July 1, 2007.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “or engineer” in (2); and in the last paragraph, substituted “the prime contractor” for “the contractor” and “the prime contractor; the retainage” for “the contractor, provided, however, that the retainage”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

66-34-205. Sums intended as payment to be held in trust.

Any sums allocated by the owner or provided or committed to the owner by a third party that are intended to be used as payment for improvements made to real property by virtue of a written contract between the owner and the prime contractor must be held by the owner or third party in trust for the benefit and use of the prime contractor and its remote contractors, and are subject to all legal and equitable remedies.

The presence of an otherwise valid agreement to arbitrate does not prevent a prime contractor or remote contractor from seeking equitable relief, including injunctive relief, as permitted by § 66-34-602 against any owner, prime contractor, or remote contractor.

The bankruptcy or insolvency of any party is not a valid defense for the failure of an owner or other third party that controls or holds those sums described in subsection (a), as well as all retainage, to release those sums when they are otherwise due.

This section does not apply to the state, including its departments, boards, or commissions, or to any institution of higher education.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 22.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a), inserted “prime” twice and substituted “its remote contractors, and are subject” for “shall be subject”; added (b) and (c); and redesignated former (b) as present (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.